District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.12

Nurses leaving the District of Columbia or applying for licensure in another state.

(a)

A nurse participating in the Program who moves to a jurisdiction where a rehabilitation program is in place and applies for licensure in that jurisdiction shall be transferred to that jurisdiction’s rehabilitation program.

(b)

A nurse participating in the Program who moves to a jurisdiction where there is no rehabilitation program and applies for licensure in that jurisdiction shall have his or her records transferred to that jurisdiction’s equivalent of the Board.

(c)

Whenever a nurse who applies for licensure in another jurisdiction continues to practice nursing in the District of Columbia:

(1)

If the jurisdiction has a rehabilitation program in place, the program shall be notified that the nurse is participating in a rehabilitation program in the District of Columbia; or

(2)

If there is no rehabilitation program in the jurisdiction, the jurisdiction’s equivalent of the Board shall be notified that the nurse is participating in a rehabilitation program in the District of Columbia.

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 13, 48 DCR 2036